Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-916
Sewers; resolution to construct; petition in opposition; effect.

If a petition, opposing the resolution, signed by property owners representing a majority of the front footage which may become subject to assessment for the cost in any proposed lateral sewer district, be filed with the clerk within three days before the date of the meeting for the hearing on such resolution, such resolution shall not be passed.

Laws 1919, c. 189, § 4, p. 428;

C.S.1922, § 4340;

C.S.1929, § 17-531;

R.S.1943, § 17-916.

Ample opportunity is given to make objections to the creation of a sanitary sewer system. Jones v. Village of Farnam, 174 Neb. 704, 119 N.W.2d 157 (1963).

Special assessments, levied by the frontage rule, must be uniform and levied on abutting property only and must not exceed the local benefits conferred. Hurd v. Sanitary Sewer District No. 1 of Harvard, 109 Neb. 384, 191 N.W. 438 (1922).